zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 冬季运动与活动 > 滑雪与单板滑雪 > 滑雪双板: 野外和越野滑雪板; 越野滑雪板; 速降滑雪板
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว > สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด > สกี: สกีแบ็กคันทรีและทัวร์ริ่ง; สกีครอสคันทรี่; สกีลงเขา
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Activités et sports d'hiver > Ski et snowboard > Skis: Skis hors-piste et de randonnée; Skis de fond; Skis alpins
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Wintersport en -activiteiten > Skiën en snowboarden > Ski's: Backcountry- en toerski's; Langlaufski's; Alpineski's
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Téli sportok és tevékenységek > Síelés és snowboardozás > Sílécek: Túrasílécek; Túrasílécek; Lesikló sílécek
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Зимние виды спорта и игры > Лыжный спорт и сноубординг > Лыжи: Лыжи для бэккантри и ски-тура; Беговые лыжи; Горные лыжи
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti > Skijanje i snowboardanje > Skije: Ruralno i turno skijanje; Cross country skije; Skije za spust
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες > Σκι & σνόουμπορντ > Σκι: Σκι εκτός πίστας και ορειβατικά σκι; Σκι ανωμάλου δρόμου; Σκι κατάβασης
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą > Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie > Narty: Narty backcountry i skiturowe; Narty biegowe; Narty zjazdowe
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Зимни спортове и дейности > Каране на ски и сноуборд > Ски: Ски за бягане и туринг; Ски за бягане; Ски за спускане
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Activități și sporturi de iarnă > Schi și snowboarding > Schiuri: Schiuri de backcountry și de tur; Schiuri cross-country; Schiuri pentru coborâre
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Zimski športi in dejavnosti > Smučanje in deskanje na snegu > Smuči: Turne in touring smuči; Smuči za tek na smučeh; Smuči za alpsko smučanje
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og aktiviteter > Ski- og snowboardutstyr > Ski: Fjellski og toppturski; Langrennsski; Slalåmski
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žiemos sportas ir veikla > Slidinėjimas ir snieglenčių sportas > Slidės: Bekelės ir turizmo slidės; Lygumų slidės; Kalnų slidės
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og -aktiviteter > Ski og snowboard > Ski: Backcountry- og touring-ski; Langrendsski; Slalomski
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Zimné športy a aktivity > Lyžovanie a snowboarding > Lyže: Lyže na backcountry a skialpinizmus; Bežecké lyže; Zjazdové lyže
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông > Trượt tuyết băng đồng và trượt ván trên tuyết > Ván trượt tuyết: Ván trượt tuyết địa hình tự nhiên và đường dài; Trượt tuyết băng đồng; Trượt tuyết đổ đèo
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport e attività invernali > Sci e snowboard > Sci: Sci da fuoripista e scialpinismo; Sci di fondo; Sci da discesa
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Vintersporter och -aktiviteter > Skid- och snowboardåkning > Skidor: Turskidor och toppturskidor; Längdåkningsskidor; Utförsåkningsskidor
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Wintersport & -Aktivitäten > Skisport & Snowboarden > Skier: Backcountry- & Tourenski; Langlaufskier; Alpinskier
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 겨울 스포츠/액티비티 > 스키/스노보드 > 스키: 백컨트리 및 투어링 스키; 크로스컨트리 스키; 활강 스키
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウィンタースポーツ > スキー・スノーボード用品 > スキー板: バックカントリー・ツーリングスキー; クロスカントリースキー; アルペンスキー
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes e atividades de inverno > Esqui e snowboarding > Esquis: Esquis backcountry e touring; Esquis cross-country; Esquis downhill
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri > Kayak ve Snowboard > Kayaklar: Dağ ve tur kayakları; Kros Kayakları; İniş Kayakları
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset > Hiihto ja lumilautailu > Sukset: Tunturi- ja vaellussukset; Maastohiihtosukset; Laskettelusukset
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zimní sporty a aktivity > Lyžování a snowboarding > Lyže: Skialpinistické lyže a běžky backcountry; Běžecké lyže; Sjezdové lyže
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Winter Sports & Activities > Skiing & Snowboarding > Skis: Backcountry & Touring Skis; Cross-Country Skis; Downhill Skis
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Actividades y deportes de invierno > Esquí y snowboard > Esquíes: Esquís de montaña y travesía; Esquíes de fondo; Esquíes de descenso
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Atividades e desportos de inverno > Esqui e snowboard > Esquis: Skis de montanha e travessia; Esquis de fundo; Esqui alpino
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 冬季運動 > 單/雙板滑雪 > 滑雪雙板: 野外與巡迴雙板滑雪板; 越野滑雪; 高山滑雪板